District of Columbia statutes.
29-413.02

Inspection of records by members.

(a)

Subject to § 29-413.07, a member of a nonprofit corporation shall be entitled to inspect and copy, during regular business hours at the corporation’s principal office, any of the records of the corporation described in § 29-413.01(e) if the member delivers to the corporation a signed notice in the form of a record at least 5 business days before the date on which the member wishes to inspect and copy.

(b)

A member of a nonprofit corporation shall be entitled to inspect and copy, during regular business hours at a reasonable location specified by the corporation, any of the following records of the corporation if the member meets the requirements of subsection (c) of this section and delivers to the corporation a signed notice in the form of a record at least 5 business days before the date on which the member wishes to inspect and copy:

(1)

Excerpts from any records required to be maintained under § 29-413.01(a), to the extent not subject to inspection under § 29-413.02(a);

(2)

Accounting records of the corporation; and

(3)

Subject to § 29-413.07, the membership list.

(c)

A member may inspect and copy the records described in subsection (b) of this section only if:

(1)

The member’s demand is made in good faith and for a proper purpose;

(2)

The member describes with reasonable particularity the purpose and the records the member desires to inspect; and

(3)

The records are directly connected with this purpose.

(d)

The right of inspection granted by this section may not be abolished or limited by a nonprofit corporation’s articles of incorporation or bylaws.

(e)

This section shall not affect:

(1)

The right of a member to inspect records under § 29-405.20 or, if the member is in litigation with the corporation, to the same extent as any other litigant; or

(2)

The power of a court, independently of this chapter, to compel the production of corporate records for examination.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(d)(20), 59 DCR 13171

Section References

This section is referenced in § 29-405.20, § 29-413.03, § 29-413.04, and § 29-413.20.

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 substituted “may not” for “may” in (d).

Editor's Notes

Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.